Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1614
Assessments; lien; certification.

All assessments shall be a lien on the property on which levied from the date of levy. The board of trustees of such road improvement district shall cause such assessments, or portion thereof remaining unpaid, to be certified to the county clerk of the county or counties for entry upon the proper tax lists as more particularly set forth in section 39-1625.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 14, p. 530.